District of Columbia statutes.
38-3003

Commission members from District.

The 7 Commission members from the District of Columbia shall be:

(1)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia;

(2)

The Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia;

(3)

The Chairperson of the Committee on Education of the Council of the District of Columbia;

(4)

The President of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia;

(5)

The Superintendent of Schools of the District of Columbia;

(6)

The Chairperson of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia; and

(7)

The President of the University of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-65, § 4, 31 DCR 198
This section is referenced in § 38-3002.
1981 Ed., § 31-2303.
The “Committee on Education of the Council of the District of Columbia,” referred to in paragraph (3), has been changed to the “Committee on Education and Libraries” by Resolution 7-1 which adopted the Rules Resolution for Council Period VII, effective January 2, 1987.